Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of children, youth, and families pertaining to juvenile justice services under this chapter and chapters 13.04, 13.06, 13.16, 13.40, 28A.190, 28A.225, 74.14A, 72.01, 72.05, 72.19, 71.34, and 72.72 RCW are transferred to the department of corrections. All references to the secretary or the department of children, youth, and families in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or the department of corrections when referring to the functions transferred in this section.(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of children, youth, and families pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of corrections. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of children, youth, and families in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available to the department of corrections. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the department of corrections.(b) Any appropriations made to the department of children, youth, and families for carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall, on July 1, 2026, be transferred and credited to the department of corrections.(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.(3) All employees of the department of children, youth, and families engaged in performing the powers, duties, and functions transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of corrections to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of children, youth, and families pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of corrections. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of corrections.(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of children, youth, and families shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2026.(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer.Â Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.(7)(a) The portions of any bargaining units of employees at the department of children, youth, and families existing on July 1, 2026, that are transferred to the department of corrections shall be considered separate appropriate units within the department of corrections unless and until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to Title 391 WAC. The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as representing the portions of the bargaining units of employees at the department of children, youth, and families existing on July 1, 2026, shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representatives of the transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.(b) The public employment relations commission may review the appropriateness of the collective bargaining units that are a result of the transfer from the department of children, youth, and families to the department of corrections under this act. The employer or the exclusive bargaining representative may petition the public employment relations commission to review the bargaining units in accordance with this section.Sec. 2. RCW 13.04.011 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 601 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:For purposes of this title:(1) "Adjudication" has the same meaning as "conviction" in RCW 9.94A.030, but only for the purposes of sentencing under chapter 9.94A RCW;(2) "Court" when used without further qualification means the juvenile court judge(s) or commissioner(s);(3) "Custodian" means that person who has the legal right to custody of the child;(4) "Department" means the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections;(5) Except as specifically provided in RCW 13.40.020 and chapters 13.24 and 13.34 RCW, "juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years;(6) "Juvenile offender" and "juvenile offense" have the meaning ascribed in RCW 13.40.020;(7) "Parent" or "parents," except as used in chapter 13.34 RCW, means that parent or parents who have the right of legal custody of the child.Sec. 3. RCW 13.40.020 and 2025 c 140 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:For the purposes of this chapter:(1) "Assessment" means an individualized examination of a child to determine the child's psychosocial needs and problems, including the type and extent of any mental health, substance abuse, or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders, and recommendations for treatment. "Assessment" includes, but is not limited to, drug and alcohol evaluations, psychological and psychiatric evaluations, records review, clinical interview, and administration of a formal test or instrument;(2) "Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the following: Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy classes; counseling including an intake appointment, outpatient substance abuse treatment programs, outpatient mental health programs, anger management classes, education or outpatient treatment programs to prevent animal cruelty, or other services including, when appropriate, restorative justice programs; or attendance at school or other educational programs appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school district. Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to available funds;(3) "Community-based sanctions" may include community restitution not to exceed 150 hours of community restitution;(4) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender as punishment for committing an offense. Community restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or through work crews;(5) "Community supervision" means an order of disposition by the court of an adjudicated youth not committed to the department or an order granting a deferred disposition. A community supervision order for a single offense may be for a period of up to two years for a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up to one year for other offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to comply with the mandatory school attendance provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to inform the school of the existence of this requirement. Community supervision is an individualized program comprised of one or more of the following:(a) Community-based sanctions;(b) Community-based rehabilitation;(c) Monitoring and reporting requirements;(d) Posting of a probation bond;(e) Residential treatment, where substance abuse, mental health, and/or co-occurring disorders have been identified in an assessment by a qualified mental health professional, psychologist, psychiatrist, co-occurring disorder specialist, or substance use disorder professional and a funded bed is available. If a child agrees to voluntary placement in a state-funded long-term evaluation and treatment facility, the case must follow the existing placement procedure including consideration of less restrictive treatment options and medical necessity.(i) A court may order residential treatment after consideration and findings regarding whether:(A) The referral is necessary to rehabilitate the child;(B) The referral is necessary to protect the public or the child;(C) The referral is in the child's best interest;(D) The child has been given the opportunity to engage in less restrictive treatment and has been unable or unwilling to comply; and(E) Inpatient treatment is the least restrictive action consistent with the child's needs and circumstances.(ii) In any case where a court orders a child to inpatient treatment under this section, the court must hold a review hearing no later than 60 days after the youth begins inpatient treatment, and every 30 days thereafter, as long as the youth is in inpatient treatment;(6) "Community transition services" means a therapeutic and supportive community-based custody option in which:(a) A person serves a portion of their term of confinement residing in the community, outside of department institutions and community facilities;(b) The department supervises the person in part through the use of technology that is capable of determining or identifying the monitored person's presence or absence at a particular location;(c) The department provides access to developmentally appropriate, trauma-informed, racial equity-based, and culturally relevant programs to promote successful reentry; and(d) The department prioritizes the delivery of available programming from individuals who share characteristics with the individual being served related to: Race, ethnicity, sexual identity, and gender identity;(7) "Confinement" means physical custody by the department ((of children, youth, and families)) in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state, or physical custody in a detention facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with any county. The county may operate or contract with vendors to operate county detention facilities. The department may operate or contract to operate detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department. Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than 31 days imposed as part of a disposition or modification order may be served consecutively or intermittently, in the discretion of the court;(8) "Court," when used without further qualification, means the juvenile court judge(s) or commissioner(s);(9) "Criminal history" includes all criminal complaints against the respondent for which, prior to the commission of a current offense, the allegations were found correct by a court. If a respondent is convicted of two or more charges arising out of the same course of conduct, only the highest charge from among these shall count as an offense for the purposes of this chapter. A successfully completed deferred adjudication that was entered before July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be considered part of the respondent's criminal history. A successfully completed diversion under RCW 13.40.080 may not be considered part of the respondent's criminal history;(10) "Custodial interrogation" means express questioning or other actions or words by a law enforcement officer which are reasonably likely to elicit an incriminating response from an individual and occurs when reasonable individuals in the same circumstances would consider themselves in custody;(11) "Department" means the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections;(12) "Detention facility" means a county facility, paid for by the county, for the physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have committed an offense or an adjudicated offender subject to a disposition or modification order. "Detention facility" includes county group homes, inpatient substance abuse programs, juvenile basic training camps, and electronic monitoring;(13) "Diversion unit" means any probation counselor who enters into a diversion agreement with an alleged youthful offender, or any other person, community accountability board, youth court under the supervision of the juvenile court, or other entity with whom the juvenile court administrator has contracted to arrange and supervise such agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person, community accountability board, or other entity specially funded by the legislature to arrange and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "community accountability board" means a board comprised of members of the local community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior court shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include a variety of representatives from the community, such as a law enforcement officer, teacher or school administrator, high school student, parent, and business owner, and should represent the cultural diversity of the local community;(14) "Foster care" means temporary physical care in a foster family home or group care facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by the department, or other legally authorized care;(15) "Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant to chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;(16) "Intensive supervision program" means a parole program that requires intensive supervision and monitoring, offers an array of individualized treatment and transitional services, and emphasizes community involvement and support in order to reduce the likelihood a juvenile offender will commit further offenses;(17) "Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any individual who is under the chronological age of 18 years and who has not been previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110, unless the individual was convicted of a lesser charge or acquitted of the charge for which he or she was previously transferred pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or who is not otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;(18) "Juvenile offender" means any juvenile who has been found by the juvenile court to have committed an offense, including a person 18 years of age or older over whom the juvenile court has jurisdiction under RCW 13.40.300;(19) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix;(20) "Local sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0-30 days of confinement; (b) 0-12 months of community supervision; or (c) 0-150 hours of community restitution;(21) "Manifest injustice" means a disposition that would either impose an excessive penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious, and clear danger to society in light of the purposes of this chapter;(22) "Monitoring and reporting requirements" means one or more of the following: Curfews; requirements to remain at home, school, work, or court-ordered treatment programs during specified hours; restrictions from leaving or entering specified geographical areas; requirements to report to the probation officer as directed and to remain under the probation officer's supervision; and other conditions or limitations as the court may require which may not include confinement;(23) "Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if committed by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance of any city or county of this state, under any federal law, or under the law of another state if the act occurred in that state;(24) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or physical intervention to control a juvenile offender or limit a juvenile offender's freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical restraint. Physical restraint does not include momentary periods of minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact, without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited force and designed to:(a) Prevent a juvenile offender from completing an act that would result in potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property;(b) Remove a disruptive juvenile offender who is unwilling to leave the area voluntarily; or(c) Guide a juvenile offender from one location to another;(25) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a woman or youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician determines is necessary for healing after the youth leaves the hospital, birthing center, or clinic;(26) "Probation bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security by a surety justified and approved by the court, to secure the offender's appearance at required court proceedings and compliance with court-ordered community supervision or conditions of release ordered pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or 13.40.050. It also means a deposit of cash or posting of other collateral in lieu of a bond if approved by the court;(27) "Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have committed an offense;(28) "Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to the victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical treatment for physical injury to persons, lost wages resulting from physical injury, and costs of the victim's counseling reasonably related to the offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses. Nothing in this chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies or defenses available to the victim or offender;(29) "Restorative justice" means practices, policies, and programs informed by and sensitive to the needs of crime victims that are designed to encourage offenders to accept responsibility for repairing the harm caused by their offense by providing safe and supportive opportunities for voluntary participation and communication between the victim, the offender, their families, and relevant community members;(30) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:(a) Physical restraint; or(b) Mechanical device including but not limited to: Metal handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons;(31) "Risk assessment tool" means the statistically valid tool used by the department to inform release or placement decisions related to security level, release within the sentencing range, community facility eligibility, community transition services eligibility, and parole. The "risk assessment tool" is used by the department to predict the likelihood of successful reentry and future criminal behavior;(32) "Screening" means a process that is designed to identify a child who is at risk of having mental health, substance abuse, or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders that warrant immediate attention, intervention, or more comprehensive assessment. A screening may be undertaken with or without the administration of a formal instrument;(33) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department;(34) "Services" means services, including restorative justice, which provide alternatives to incarceration for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated guilty of an offense or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to this chapter;(35) "Sex offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW 9.94A.030;(36) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the respondent committed the offense was for the purpose of the respondent's sexual gratification;(37) "Surety" means an entity licensed under state insurance laws or by the state department of licensing, to write corporate, property, or probation bonds within the state, and justified and approved by the superior court of the county having jurisdiction of the case;(38) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means, of an incarcerated pregnant youth from the institution or detention facility to another location from the moment she leaves the institution or detention facility to the time of arrival at the other location, and includes the escorting of the pregnant incarcerated youth from the institution or detention facility to a transport vehicle and from the vehicle to the other location;(39) "Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an adult, must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by sanctions which do not include incarceration;(40) "Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;(41) "Youth court" means a diversion unit under the supervision of the juvenile court.Sec. 4. RCW 13.40.050 and 1997 c 338 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When a juvenile taken into custody is held in detention:(a) An information, a community supervision modification or termination of diversion petition, or a parole modification petition shall be filed within seventy-two hours, Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays excluded, or the juvenile shall be released; and(b) A detention hearing, a community supervision modification or termination of diversion petition, or a parole modification petition shall be held within seventy-two hours, Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays excluded, from the time of filing the information or petition, to determine whether continued detention is necessary under RCW 13.40.040.(2) Notice of the detention hearing, stating the time, place, and purpose of the hearing, stating the right to counsel, and requiring attendance shall be given to the parent, guardian, or custodian if such person can be found and shall also be given to the juvenile if over twelve years of age.(3) At the commencement of the detention hearing, the court shall advise the parties of their rights under this chapter and shall appoint counsel as specified in this chapter.(4) The court shall, based upon the allegations in the information, determine whether the case is properly before it or whether the case should be treated as a diversion case under RCW 13.40.080. If the case is not properly before the court the juvenile shall be ordered released.(5) Notwithstanding a determination that the case is properly before the court and that probable cause exists, a juvenile shall at the detention hearing be ordered released on the juvenile's personal recognizance pending further hearing unless the court finds detention is necessary under RCW 13.40.040.(6) If detention is not necessary under RCW 13.40.040, the court shall impose the most appropriate of the following conditions or, if necessary, any combination of the following conditions:(a) Place the juvenile in the custody of a designated person agreeing to supervise such juvenile;(b) Place restrictions on the travel of the juvenile during the period of release;(c) Require the juvenile to report regularly to and remain under the supervision of the juvenile court;(d) Impose any condition other than detention deemed reasonably necessary to assure appearance as required;(e) Require that the juvenile return to detention during specified hours; or(f) Require the juvenile to post a probation bond set by the court under terms and conditions as provided in RCW 13.40.040(((4)))(5).(7) A juvenile may be released only to a responsible adult or the department of children, youth, and families.(8) If the parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile in detention is available, the court shall consult with them prior to a determination to further detain or release the juvenile or treat the case as a diversion case under RCW 13.40.080.(9) A person notified under this section who fails without reasonable cause to appear and abide by the order of the court may be proceeded against as for contempt of court. In determining whether a parent, guardian, or custodian had reasonable cause not to appear, the court may consider all factors relevant to the person's ability to appear as summoned.Sec. 5. RCW 13.40.087 and 2010 c 289 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:Within available funding, when a youth who has been diverted under RCW 13.40.070 for an alleged offense of prostitution or prostitution loitering is referred to the department of children, youth, and families, the department of children, youth, and families shall connect that youth with the services and treatment specified in RCW 74.14B.060 and 74.14B.070.Sec. 6. RCW 13.40.165 and 2023 c 449 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The purpose of this disposition alternative is to ensure that successful treatment options to reduce recidivism are available to eligible youth, pursuant to RCW 71.24.615. It is also the purpose of the disposition alternative to assure that minors in need of substance use disorder, mental health, and/or co-occurring disorder treatment receive an appropriate continuum of culturally relevant care and treatment, including prevention and early intervention, self-directed care, parent-directed care, and residential treatment. To facilitate the continuum of care and treatment to minors in out-of-home placements, all divisions of the department of children, youth, and families that provide these services to minors shall jointly plan and deliver these services. It is also the purpose of the disposition alternative to protect the rights of minors against needless hospitalization and deprivations of liberty and to enable treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs and in accordance with sound professional judgment. The mental health, substance abuse, and co-occurring disorder treatment providers shall, to the extent possible, offer services that involve minors' parents, guardians, and family.(2) The court must consider eligibility for the substance use disorder or mental health disposition alternative when a juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, other than a first time B+ offense under chapter 69.50 RCW. The court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the respondent if the evidence shows that the offender may be chemically dependent, substance abusing, or has significant mental health or co-occurring disorders may order an examination by a substance use disorder counselor from a substance use disorder treatment facility approved under chapter 70.96A RCW or a mental health professional as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW to determine if the youth is chemically dependent, substance abusing, or suffers from significant mental health or co-occurring disorders. The state shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under this subsection unless third-party insurance coverage is available.(3) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the respondent's offense history, an assessment of drug-alcohol problems, mental health diagnoses, previous treatment attempts, the respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the examiner's information.(4) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a minimum:(a) Whether inpatient and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;(b) Availability of appropriate treatment;(c) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or others;(d) Anticipated length of treatment; and(e) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.(5) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state or the respondent shall order, a second examination. The evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under this subsection unless the requesting party is the offender, in which case the state shall pay the cost if no third-party insurance coverage is available.(6)(a) After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from use of this disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section.(b) If the court determines that this disposition alternative is appropriate, then the court shall impose the standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that such disposition would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition above the standard range as indicated in option D of RCW 13.40.0357 if the disposition is an increase from the standard range and the confinement of the offender does not exceed a maximum of 52 weeks, suspend execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community supervision for up to one year. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court shall require the offender to undergo available outpatient drug/alcohol, mental health, or co-occurring disorder treatment and/or inpatient mental health or drug/alcohol treatment. The court shall only order inpatient treatment under this section if a funded bed is available. If the inpatient treatment is longer than 90 days, the court shall hold a review hearing every 30 days beyond the initial 90 days. The respondent may appear telephonically at these review hearings if in compliance with treatment. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court may impose conditions of community supervision and other sanctions, including up to 30 days of confinement, 150 hours of community restitution, and payment of restitution.(7) The mental health/co-occurring disorder/drug/alcohol treatment provider shall submit monthly reports on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at the time of the disposition.At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the court considers appropriate.If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is being revoked.(8) For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the offense charged. "Victim" may also include a known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child or is not a minor child but is incapacitated, incompetent, disabled, or deceased.(9) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically state the number of days of credit for time served.(10) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.(11) A disposition under this section is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.(12) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the costs incurred by the juvenile courts for the mental health, substance use disorder, and/or co-occurring disorder evaluations, treatment, and costs of supervision required under this section shall be paid by the health care authority.(13) A juvenile, or the parent, guardian, or other person having custody of the juvenile shall not be required to pay the cost of any evaluation or treatment ordered under this section.Sec. 7. RCW 13.40.205 and 2021 c 206 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A juvenile sentenced to a term of confinement to be served under the supervision of the department shall not be released from the physical custody of the department prior to the release date established under RCW 13.40.210 except as otherwise provided in this section.(2) A juvenile serving a term of confinement under the supervision of the department may be released on authorized leave from the physical custody of the department only if consistent with public safety and if:(a) Sixty percent of the minimum term of confinement has been served; and(b) The purpose of the leave is to enable the juvenile:(i) To visit the juvenile's family for the purpose of strengthening or preserving family relationships;(ii) To make plans for parole or release which require the juvenile's personal appearance in the community and which will facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into the community; or(iii) To make plans for a residential placement out of the juvenile's home which requires the juvenile's personal appearance in the community.(3) No authorized leave may exceed seven consecutive days. The total of all preminimum term authorized leaves granted to a juvenile prior to final discharge from confinement shall not exceed thirty days.(4) Prior to authorizing a leave, the secretary shall require a written leave plan, which shall detail the purpose of the leave and how it is to be achieved, the address at which the juvenile shall reside, the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave, and a statement by such person acknowledging familiarity with the leave plan and agreeing to supervise the juvenile and to notify the secretary immediately if the juvenile violates any terms or conditions of the leave. The leave plan shall include such terms and conditions as the secretary deems appropriate and shall be signed by the juvenile.(5) Upon authorizing a leave, the secretary shall issue to the juvenile an authorized leave order which shall contain the name of the juvenile, the fact that the juvenile is on leave from a designated facility, the time period of the leave, and the identity of an appropriate official of the department to contact when necessary. The authorized leave order shall be carried by the juvenile at all times while on leave.(6) Prior to the commencement of any authorized leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will reside during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave.(7) The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the period of time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. In cases of emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portions of subsections (2)(a), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section.(8) If requested by the juvenile's victim or the victim's immediate family, the secretary shall give notice of any leave or community transition services under subsection (13) of this section to the victim or the victim's immediate family.(9) A juvenile who violates any condition of an authorized leave plan or community transition services under subsection (13) of this section may be taken into custody and returned to the department in the same manner as an adult in identical circumstances.(10) Community transition services is an electronic monitoring program as that term is used in RCW 9A.76.130.(11) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a juvenile placed in minimum security status or in community transition services under subsection (13) of this section may participate in work, educational, community restitution, or treatment programs in the community up to twelve hours a day if approved by the secretary. Such a release shall not be deemed a leave of absence. This authorization may be increased to more than twelve hours a day up to sixteen hours a day if approved by the secretary and operated within the department's appropriations.(12) Subsections (6), (7), and (8) of this section do not apply to juveniles covered by RCW 13.40.215.(13)(a) The department may require a person in its custody to serve the remainder of the person's sentence in community transition services if the department determines that such placement is in the best interest of the person and the community using the risk assessment tool and considering the availability of appropriate placements, treatment, and programming. The department's determination described under this subsection must include consideration of the person's behavior while in confinement and any disciplinary considerations. The department shall establish appropriate conditions the person must comply with to remain in community transition services. A person must have served 60 percent of their minimum term of confinement and no less than 15 weeks of total confinement including time spent in detention prior to sentencing or the entry of a dispositional order before becoming eligible for community transition services under the authority and supervision of the department.(b) A person placed in community transition services under this section must have access to appropriate treatment and programming as determined by the department, including but not limited to:(i) Behavioral health treatment;(ii) Independent living;(iii) Employment;(iv) Education;(v) Connections to family and natural supports; and(vi) Community connections.(c) Community transition services under this section is in lieu of confinement in an institution or community facility operated by the department, and will not fulfill any period of parole required under RCW 13.40.210.(d) If a person placed in community transition services under this section violates a condition of participation in the community transition services program, or if the department determines that placement in the program is no longer in the best interests of the person or community, the person may be returned to an institution operated by the department at the department's discretion.(e) The following persons are not eligible for community transition services under this section:(i) Persons with pending charges or warrants;(ii) Persons who will be transferred to ((the))a department of corrections adult correctional facility, who are in the custody of the department of corrections and placed in an adult correctional facility, or who are under the supervision of the department of corrections after placement in an adult correctional facility;(iii) Persons who were adjudicated or convicted of the crime of murder in the first or second degree;(iv) Persons who meet the definition of a "persistent offender" as defined under RCW 9.94A.030;(v) Level III sex offenders; and(vi) Persons requiring out-of-state placement.(14) The department shall design, or contract for the design, and implement a risk assessment tool. The tool must be designed to limit bias related to race, ethnicity, gender, and age. The risk assessment tool must be certified at least every three years based on current academic standards for assessment validation, and can be certified by the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability or an outside researcher.Sec. 8. RCW 13.40.210 and 2024 c 297 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary shall set a release date for each juvenile committed to its custody. The release date shall be within the prescribed range to which a juvenile has been committed under RCW 13.40.0357 or 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW 13.40.320 concerning offenders the department determines are eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp program. Such dates shall be determined prior to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's minimum term of confinement included within the prescribed range to which the juvenile has been committed. The secretary shall release any juvenile committed to the custody of the department within four calendar days prior to the juvenile's release date or on the release date set under this chapter. Days spent in the custody of the department shall be tolled by any period of time during which a juvenile has absented himself or herself from the department's supervision without the prior approval of the secretary or the secretary's designee.(2) The secretary shall monitor the average daily population of the state's juvenile residential facilities. When the secretary concludes that in-residence population of residential facilities exceeds one hundred five percent of the rated bed capacity specified in statute, or in absence of such specification, as specified by the department in rule, the secretary may recommend reductions to the governor. On certification by the governor that the recommended reductions are necessary, the secretary has authority to administratively release a sufficient number of offenders to reduce in-residence population to one hundred percent of rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release those offenders who have served the greatest proportion of their sentence. However, the secretary may deny release in a particular case at the request of an offender, or if the secretary finds that there is no responsible custodian, as determined by the department, to whom to release the offender, or if the release of the offender would pose a clear danger to society. The department shall notify the committing court of the release at the time of release if any such early releases have occurred as a result of excessive in-residence population. In no event shall an offender adjudicated of a violent offense be granted release under the provisions of this subsection.(3)(a) Following the release of any juvenile under subsection (1) of this section, the secretary may require the juvenile to comply with a program of parole to be administered by the department in his or her community which shall last no longer than eighteen months, except that in the case of a juvenile sentenced for a sex offense as defined under RCW 9.94A.030 the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in the discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when the secretary finds that an additional period of parole is necessary and appropriate in the interests of public safety or to meet the ongoing needs of the juvenile. A parole program is mandatory for offenders released under subsection (2) of this section and for offenders who receive a juvenile residential commitment sentence for theft of a motor vehicle, possession of a stolen motor vehicle, or taking a motor vehicle without permission 1. A juvenile adjudicated for unlawful possession of a firearm, possession of a stolen firearm, theft of a firearm, or drive-by shooting may participate in aggression replacement training, functional family therapy, or functional family parole aftercare if the juvenile meets eligibility requirements for these services. The decision to place an offender in an evidence-based parole program shall be based on an assessment by the department of the offender's risk for reoffending upon release and an assessment of the ongoing treatment needs of the juvenile. The department shall prioritize available parole resources to provide supervision and services to offenders at moderate to high risk for reoffending.(b) The secretary shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into his or her community and to further this goal shall require the juvenile to refrain from possessing a firearm or using a deadly weapon, and refrain from committing new offenses or violating any orders issued by the juvenile court pursuant to chapter 7.105 RCW, and may require the juvenile to: (i) Undergo available medical, psychiatric, drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental health, and other offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed to a parole officer and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational training, or employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address where he or she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during specified hours; (vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries; (vii) submit to electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using illegal drugs and alcohol, and submit to random urinalysis when requested by the assigned parole officer; (ix) refrain from contact with specific individuals or a specified class of individuals; (x) meet other conditions determined by the parole officer to further enhance the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community restitution. Community restitution for the purpose of this section means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender. Community restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or through work crews.(c) The secretary may further require up to twenty-five percent of the highest risk juvenile offenders who are placed on parole to participate in an intensive supervision program. Offenders participating in an intensive supervision program shall be required to comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b) of this subsection and shall also be required to comply with the following additional terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any conduct that threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an assigned community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements imposed by the community case manager related to participating in the intensive supervision program. As a part of the intensive supervision program, the secretary may require day reporting.(d) After termination of the parole period, the juvenile shall be discharged from the department's supervision.(4)(a) The department may also modify parole for violation thereof. If, after affording a juvenile all of the due process rights to which he or she would be entitled if the juvenile were an adult, the secretary finds that a juvenile has violated a condition of his or her parole, the secretary shall order one of the following which is reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole and to protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same conditions previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with increased reporting requirements; (iii) additional conditions of supervision authorized by this chapter; (iv) except as provided in (a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection, imposition of a period of confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city or county for a portion of each day or for a certain number of days each week with the balance of the days or weeks spent under supervision; (v) the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the offense for which the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or second degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child molestation in the first degree, indecent liberties with forcible compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the youth has completed the basic training camp program as described in RCW 13.40.320.(b) The secretary may modify parole and order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for up to twenty-four weeks if the offender was sentenced for a sex offense as defined under RCW 9A.44.128 and is known to have violated the terms of parole. Confinement beyond thirty days is intended to only be used for a small and limited number of sex offenders. It shall only be used when other graduated sanctions or interventions have not been effective or the behavior is so egregious it warrants the use of the higher level intervention and the violation: (i) Is a known pattern of behavior consistent with a previous sex offense that puts the youth at high risk for reoffending sexually; (ii) consists of sexual behavior that is determined to be predatory as defined in RCW 71.09.020; or (iii) requires a review under chapter 71.09 RCW, due to a recent overt act. The total number of days of confinement for violations of parole conditions during the parole period shall not exceed the number of days provided by the maximum sentence imposed by the disposition for the underlying offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.0357. The department shall not aggregate multiple parole violations that occur prior to the parole revocation hearing and impose consecutive twenty-four week periods of confinement for each parole violation. The department is authorized to engage in rule making pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement this subsection, including narrowly defining the behaviors that could lead to this higher level intervention.(c) If the department finds that any juvenile in a program of parole has possessed a firearm or used a deadly weapon during the program of parole, the department shall modify the parole under (a) of this subsection and confine the juvenile for at least thirty days. Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state or any county.(5) A parole officer of the department ((of children, youth, and families)) shall have the power to arrest a juvenile under his or her supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement officer would be authorized to arrest the person.(6) If so requested and approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the secretary shall permit a county or group of counties to perform functions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section.Sec. 9. RCW 13.40.280 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 611 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary of the department ((of children, youth, and families, with the consent of the secretary of the department of corrections,)) has the authority to transfer a juvenile presently or hereafter committed to a juvenile rehabilitation institution of the department ((of children, youth, and families)) to ((the))a department of corrections adult correctional facility for appropriate institutional placement in accordance with this section.(2) The secretary of the department ((of children, youth, and families may, with the consent of the secretary of the department of corrections,))may transfer a juvenile offender to ((the))a department of corrections adult correctional facility if it is established at a hearing before a review board that continued placement of the juvenile offender in an institution for juvenile offenders presents a continuing and serious threat to the safety of others in the institution. The department ((of children, youth, and families)) shall establish rules for the conduct of the hearing, including provision of counsel for the juvenile offender.(3) Assaults made against any staff member at a juvenile corrections institution that are reported to a local law enforcement agency shall require a hearing held by the department ((of children, youth, and families)) review board within ((ten))10 judicial working days. The board shall determine whether the accused juvenile offender represents a continuing and serious threat to the safety of others in the institution.(4) Upon conviction in a court of law for custodial assault as defined in RCW 9A.36.100, the department ((of children, youth, and families)) review board shall conduct a second hearing, within five judicial working days, to recommend to the secretary of the department ((of children, youth, and families)) that the convicted juvenile be transferred to an adult correctional facility if the review board has determined the juvenile offender represents a continuing and serious threat to the safety of others in the institution.The juvenile has the burden to show cause why the transfer to an adult correctional facility should not occur.(5) A juvenile offender transferred to an ((institution operated by the department of corrections))adult correctional facility shall not remain in such an institution beyond the maximum term of confinement imposed by the juvenile court.(6) A juvenile offender who has been transferred to ((the department of corrections))an adult correctional facility under this section may, in the discretion of the secretary of the department ((of children, youth, and families and with the consent of the secretary of the department of corrections)), be transferred from an adult correctional institution ((operated by the department of corrections)) to a facility for juvenile offenders deemed appropriate by the secretary.Sec. 10. RCW 13.40.285 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 612 are each amended to read as follows:A juvenile offender ordered to serve a term of confinement ((with the department of children, youth, and families))in a facility for juvenile offenders who is subsequently sentenced to an adult correctional institution of the department ((of corrections)) may, with the consent of the department ((of corrections)), be transferred ((by the secretary of children, youth, and families)) to ((the department of corrections))an adult correctional institution to serve the balance of the term of confinement ordered by the juvenile court. The juvenile and adult sentences shall be served consecutively. In no case shall the secretary credit time served as a result of an adult conviction against the term of confinement ordered by the juvenile court.Sec. 11. RCW 13.40.730 and 2021 c 206 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:The department ((of children, youth, and families)) shall adopt rules, policies, and procedures as may be needed to implement a community transition services program required by chapter 206, Laws of 2021, to include the following:(1) Identification and regular monitoring of metrics of quality implementation for the community transition program, and regularly publishing outcome analyses for program participants; and(2) Allowing for the use of new electronic home monitoring equipment and technologies as they become available that eliminate or minimize trauma, social stigma, and racial injustice, and imposing penalties for the knowing or intentional tampering, damaging, or destruction of equipment that renders it not fully functional.Sec. 12. RCW 74.14A.030 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 625 are each amended to read as follows:The department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections shall address the needs of juvenile offenders whose standard range sentences do not include commitment by developing nonresidential community-based programs designed to reduce the incidence of manifest injustice commitments when consistent with public safety.Sec. 13. RCW 74.14A.040 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 626 are each amended to read as follows:The department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections shall involve a juvenile offender's family as a unit in the treatment process. The department of corrections need not involve the family as a unit in cases when family ties have by necessity been irrevocably broken. When the natural parents have been or will be replaced by a foster family or guardian, the new family will be involved in the treatment process.Sec. 14. RCW 72.01.045 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 627 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For purposes of this section only, "assault" means an unauthorized touching of an employee by a resident, patient, or juvenile offender resulting in physical injury to the employee.(2) In recognition of the hazardous nature of employment in state institutions, the legislature hereby provides a supplementary program to reimburse employees of the department of social and health services, the department of natural resources, the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections, and the department of veterans affairs for some of their costs attributable to their being the victims of assault by residents, patients, or juvenile offenders. This program shall be limited to the reimbursement provided in this section.(3) An employee is only entitled to receive the reimbursement provided in this section if the secretary of social and health services, the commissioner of public lands, the secretary of the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections, or the director of the department of veterans affairs, or the secretary's, commissioner's, or director's designee, finds that each of the following has occurred:(a) A resident or patient has assaulted the employee and as a result thereof the employee has sustained demonstrated physical injuries which have required the employee to miss days of work;(b) The assault cannot be attributable to any extent to the employee's negligence, misconduct, or failure to comply with any rules or conditions of employment; and(c) The department of labor and industries has approved the employee's workers' compensation application pursuant to chapter 51.32 RCW.(4) The reimbursement authorized under this section shall be as follows:(a) The employee's accumulated sick leave days shall not be reduced for the workdays missed;(b) For each workday missed for which the employee is not eligible to receive compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee shall receive full pay; and(c) In respect to workdays missed for which the employee will receive or has received compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee shall be reimbursed in an amount which, when added to that compensation, will result in the employee receiving full pay for the workdays missed.(5) Reimbursement under this section may not last longer than ((three hundred sixty-five))365 consecutive days after the date of the injury.(6) The employee shall not be entitled to the reimbursement provided in subsection (4) of this section for any workday for which the secretary, commissioner, director, or applicable designee, finds that the employee has not diligently pursued his or her compensation remedies under chapter 51.32 RCW.(7) The reimbursement shall only be made for absences which the secretary, commissioner, director, or applicable designee believes are justified.(8) While the employee is receiving reimbursement under this section, he or she shall continue to be classified as a state employee and the reimbursement amount shall be considered as salary or wages.(9) All reimbursement payments required to be made to employees under this section shall be made by the employing department. The payments shall be considered as a salary or wage expense and shall be paid by the department in the same manner and from the same appropriations as other salary and wage expenses of the department.(10) Should the legislature revoke the reimbursement authorized under this section or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled thereafter to receive the reimbursement as a matter of contractual right.Sec. 15. RCW 72.01.050 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 628 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary of social and health services shall have full power to manage and govern the following public institutions: The western state hospital, the eastern state hospital, the northern state hospital, Lakeland Village, the Rainier school, and such other institutions as authorized by law, subject only to the limitations contained in laws relating to the management of such institutions.(2) The secretary of corrections shall have full power to manage, govern, and name all state correctional facilities, subject only to the limitations contained in laws relating to the management of such institutions.(3) If any state correctional facility is fully or partially destroyed by natural causes or otherwise, the secretary of corrections may, with the approval of the governor, provide for the establishment and operation of additional residential correctional facilities to place those inmates displaced by such destruction. However, such additional facilities may not be established if there are existing residential correctional facilities to which all of the displaced inmates can be appropriately placed. The establishment and operation of any additional facility shall be on a temporary basis, and the facility may not be operated beyond July 1 of the year following the year in which it was partially or fully destroyed.(4) The secretary of the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections shall have full power to manage and govern Echo Glen, the Green Hill school, and such other institutions as authorized by law, subject only to the limitations contained in laws relating to the management of such institutions.Sec. 16. RCW 13.16.100 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 629 are each amended to read as follows:Motion pictures unrated after November 1968 or rated R, X, or NC-17 by the motion picture association of America shall not be shown in juvenile detention facilities or facilities operated by the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections.Sec. 17. RCW 28A.225.010 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 630 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All parents in this state of any child eight years of age and under eighteen years of age shall cause such child to attend the public school of the district in which the child resides and such child shall have the responsibility to and therefore shall attend for the full time when such school may be in session unless:(a) The child is attending an approved private school for the same time or is enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW 28A.195.010(4);(b) The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in subsection (4) of this section;(c) The child is attending an education center as provided in chapter 28A.205 RCW;(d) The school district superintendent of the district in which the child resides shall have excused such child from attendance because the child is physically or mentally unable to attend school, is attending a residential school operated by the department of social and health services or the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections, is incarcerated in an adult correctional facility, or has been temporarily excused upon the request of his or her parents for purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the parent: PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed to cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational progress: PROVIDED FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary absences may be claimed as full-time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and shall not affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220;(e) The child is excused from school subject to approval by the student's parent for a reason of faith or conscience, or an organized activity conducted under the auspices of a religious denomination, church, or religious organization, for up to two days per school year without any penalty. Such absences may not mandate school closures. Students excused for such temporary absences may be claimed as full-time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and may not affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220; or(f) The child is sixteen years of age or older and:(i) The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the parent agrees that the child should not be required to attend school or the child is emancipated in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;(ii) The child has already met graduation requirements in accordance with state board of education rules and regulations; or(iii) The child has received a certificate of educational competence under rules and regulations established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.190.(2) A parent for the purpose of this chapter means a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of a child.(3) An approved private school for the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be one approved under regulations established by the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130.(4) For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW, instruction shall be home-based if it consists of planned and supervised instructional and related educational activities, including a curriculum and instruction in the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of an appreciation of art and music, provided for a number of hours equivalent to the total annual program hours per grade level established for approved private schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and 28A.195.040 and if such activities are:(a) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and are supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section, "supervised by a certificated person" means: The planning by the certificated person and the parent of objectives consistent with this subsection; a minimum each month of an average of one contact hour per week with the child being supervised by the certificated person; and evaluation of such child's progress by the certificated person. The number of children supervised by the certificated person shall not exceed thirty for purposes of this subsection; or(b) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and who has either earned forty-five college-level quarter credit hours or its equivalent in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or(c) Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to provide home-based instruction by the superintendent of the local school district in which the child resides.(5) The legislature recognizes that home-based instruction is less structured and more experiential than the instruction normally provided in a classroom setting. Therefore, the provisions of subsection (4) of this section relating to the nature and quantity of instructional and related educational activities shall be liberally construed.Sec. 18. RCW 72.05.010 and 2020 c 274 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The purposes of ((RCW 72.05.010))this section and RCW 72.05.020 through 72.05.210 are: To provide for every child with behavior problems, persons with disabilities, and hearing and visually impaired children, within the purview of ((RCW 72.05.010))this section and RCW 72.05.020 through 72.05.210, as now or hereafter amended, such care, guidance and instruction, control and treatment as will best serve the welfare of the child or person and society; to insure nonpolitical and qualified operation, supervision, management, and control of the Green Hill school, the Naselle Youth Camp, Echo Glen, Lakeland Village, Rainier school, the Yakima Valley school, Fircrest school, the Child Study and Treatment Center and Secondary School of western state hospital, and like residential state schools, camps, and centers hereafter established; and to provide for the persons committed or admitted to those schools that type of care, instruction, and treatment most likely to accomplish their rehabilitation and restoration to normal citizenship.(2) To further such purposes, Green Hill School, Echo Glen, Naselle Youth Camp, and such other juvenile rehabilitation facilities, as may hereafter be established, are placed under the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections; Lakeland Village, Rainier school, the Yakima Valley school, Fircrest school, the Child Study and Treatment Center and Secondary School of western state hospital, and like residential state schools, camps, and centers, hereafter established, are placed under the department of social and health services.Sec. 19. RCW 72.05.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:(1) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185. A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the department is not a community facility.(2) "Department" means the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections.(3) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department under RCW 13.40.185.(4) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix.(5) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or physical intervention to control an offender or limit a juvenile offender's freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical restraint. Physical restraint does not include momentary periods of minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact, without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited force and designed to:(a) Prevent a juvenile offender from completing an act that would result in potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property;(b) Remove a disruptive juvenile offender who is unwilling to leave the area voluntarily; or(c) Guide a juvenile offender from one location to another.(6) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician determines is necessary for healing after the youth leaves the hospital, birthing center, or clinic.(7) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:(a) Physical restraint; or(b) Mechanical device including but not limited to: Metal handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons.(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department.(9) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community facility.(10) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means, of an incarcerated pregnant woman or youth from the institution or community facility to another location from the moment she leaves the institution or community facility to the time of arrival at the other location, and includes the escorting of the pregnant incarcerated woman or youth from the institution or community facility to a transport vehicle and from the vehicle to the other location.Sec. 20. RCW 72.05.130 and 2020 c 274 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:The department of social and health services and the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections shall establish, maintain, operate and administer a comprehensive program for the custody, care, education, treatment, instruction, guidance, control, and rehabilitation of all persons who may be committed or admitted to institutions, schools, or other facilities, placed under the control of each, except for the programs of education provided pursuant to RCW 28A.190.030 through 28A.190.050 which shall be established, operated, and administered by the school district conducting the program, and in order to accomplish these purposes, the powers and duties of the secretary of the department of social and health services and the secretary of the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections for the institutions placed under the respective department shall include the following:(1) The assembling, analyzing, tabulating, and reproduction in report form, of statistics and other data with respect to children with behavior problems in the state of Washington, including, but not limited to, the extent, kind, and causes of such behavior problems in the different areas and population centers of the state. Such reports shall not be open to public inspection, but shall be open to the inspection of the governor and to the superior court judges of the state of Washington.(2) The establishment and supervision of diagnostic facilities and services in connection with the custody, care, and treatment of persons with disabilities, and behavior problem children who may be committed or admitted to any of the institutions, schools, or facilities controlled and operated by the department, or who may be referred for such diagnosis and treatment by any superior court of this state. Such diagnostic services may be established in connection with, or apart from, any other state institution under the supervision and direction of the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections. Such diagnostic services shall be available to the superior courts of the state for persons referred for such services by them prior to commitment, or admission to, any school, institution, or other facility. Such diagnostic services shall also be available to other departments of the state. When the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections determines it necessary, the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections may create waiting lists and set priorities for use of diagnostic services for juvenile offenders on the basis of those most severely in need.(3) The supervision of all persons committed or admitted to any institution, school, or other facility operated by the department of social and health services or the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections, and the transfer of such persons from any such institution, school, or facility to any other such school, institution, or facility: PROVIDED, That where a person has been committed to a minimum security institution, school, or facility by any of the superior courts of this state, a transfer to a close security institution shall be made only with the consent and approval of such court.(4) The supervision of parole, discharge, or other release, and the post-institutional placement of all persons committed to Green Hill school, or such as may be assigned, paroled, or transferred therefrom to other facilities operated by the department. Green Hill school is hereby designated as a "close security" institution to which shall be given the custody of children with the most serious behavior problems.Sec. 21. RCW 72.05.154 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:From and after July 1, 1973, any inmate working in a juvenile forest camp established and operated pursuant to RCW 72.05.150, pursuant to an agreement between the department or the department of children, youth, and families and the department of natural resources shall be eligible for the benefits provided by Title 51 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, relating to industrial insurance, with the exceptions provided by this section.No inmate as described in RCW 72.05.152, until released upon an order of parole by the department ((of children, youth, and families)), or discharged from custody upon expiration of sentence, or discharged from custody by order of a court of appropriate jurisdiction, or his or her dependents or beneficiaries, shall be entitled to any payment for temporary disability or permanent total disability as provided for in RCW 51.32.090 or 51.32.060 respectively, as now or hereafter amended, or to the benefits of chapter 51.36 RCW relating to medical aid: PROVIDED, That RCW 72.05.152 and this section shall not affect the eligibility, payment or distribution of benefits for any industrial injury to the inmate which occurred prior to his or her existing commitment to the department of children, youth, and families.Any and all premiums or assessments as may arise under this section pursuant to the provisions of Title 51 RCW shall be the obligation of and be paid by the state department of natural resources.Sec. 22. RCW 72.05.440 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 707 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person shall not be eligible for an employed or volunteer position within the department ((of children, youth, and families)) or any agency with which it contracts in which the person may have regular access to juveniles under the jurisdiction of the department ((of children, youth, and families or the department of corrections)) if the person has been convicted of one or more of the following:(a) Any felony sex offense;(b) Any violent offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies only to persons hired by the department or any of its contracting agencies after September 1, 1998.(3) Any person employed by the department ((of children, youth, and families)), or by any contracting agency, who may have regular access to juveniles under the jurisdiction of the department ((of children, youth, and families or the department of corrections)) and who is convicted of an offense set forth in this section after September 1, 1998, shall report the conviction to his or her supervisor. The report must be made within seven days of conviction. Failure to report within seven days of conviction constitutes misconduct under Title 50 RCW.(4) For purposes of this section "may have regular access to juveniles" means access for more than a nominal amount of time.(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 23. RCW 72.19.010 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:There is hereby established under the supervision and control of the secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections a correctional institution for the confinement and rehabilitation of juveniles committed by the juvenile courts to the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections. Such institution shall be situated upon publicly owned lands within King county, under the supervision of the department of natural resources, which land is located in the vicinity of Echo Lake and more particularly situated in Section 34, Township 24 North, Range 7 East W.M. and that portion of Section 3, Township 23 North, Range 7 East W.M. lying north of U.S. Highway 10, together with necessary access routes thereto, all of which tract is leased by the department of natural resources to the department of children, youth, and families for the establishment and construction of the correctional institution authorized and provided for in this chapter.Sec. 24. RCW 72.19.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 709 are each amended to read as follows:The secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections may make, amend, and repeal rules for the administration of the juvenile correctional institution established by this chapter in furtherance of the provisions of this chapter and not inconsistent with law.Sec. 25. RCW 72.19.030 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 710 are each amended to read as follows:The superintendent of the correctional institution established by this chapter shall be appointed by the secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections.Sec. 26. RCW 72.19.040 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 711 are each amended to read as follows:The superintendent, subject to the approval of the secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections, shall appoint such associate superintendents as shall be deemed necessary. In the event the superintendent shall be absent from the institution, or during periods of illness or other situations incapacitating the superintendent from properly performing his or her duties, one of the associate superintendents of such institution shall act as superintendent during such period of absence, illness, or incapacity as may be designated by the secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections.Sec. 27. RCW 72.19.050 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 712 are each amended to read as follows:The superintendent shall have the following powers, duties and responsibilities:(1) Subject to the rules of the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections, the superintendent shall have the supervision and management of the institution, of the grounds and buildings, the subordinate officers and employees, and of the juveniles received at such institution and the custody of such persons until released or transferred as provided by law.(2) Subject to the rules of the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections and the office of financial management, appoint all subordinate officers and employees.(3) The superintendent shall be the custodian of the personal property of all juveniles in the institution and shall make rules governing the accounting and disposition of all moneys received by such juveniles, not inconsistent with the law, and subject to the approval of the secretary of the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections.Sec. 28. RCW 72.19.060 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 713 are each amended to read as follows:The plans and construction of the juvenile correctional institution established by this chapter shall provide for adequate separation of the residential housing of the male juvenile from the female juvenile. In all other respects, the juvenile correctional programs for both boys and girls may be combined or separated as the secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections deems most reasonable and effective to accomplish the reformation, training and rehabilitation of the juvenile offender, realizing all possible economies from the lack of necessity for duplication of facilities.Sec. 29. RCW 72.72.030 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 714 are each amended to read as follows:(((1))) There is hereby created, in the state treasury, an institutional impact account. The secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections may reimburse political subdivisions for criminal justice costs incurred directly as a result of crimes committed by offenders residing in an institution as defined herein under the jurisdiction of the secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections. Such reimbursement shall be made to the extent funds are available from the institutional impact account. Reimbursements shall be limited to law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which are documented to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the offender.(((2) The secretary of corrections may reimburse political subdivisions for criminal justice costs incurred directly as a result of crimes committed by offenders residing in an institution as defined herein under the jurisdiction of the secretary of corrections. Such reimbursement shall be made to the extent funds are available from the institutional impact account. Reimbursements shall be limited to law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which are documented to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the offender.))Sec. 30. RCW 72.72.040 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 715 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary of ((children, youth, and families and the secretary))the department of corrections shall ((each)) promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW regarding the reimbursement process for their respective agencies.(2) Reimbursement shall not be made if otherwise provided pursuant to other provisions of state law.Sec. 31. RCW 13.06.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 716 are each amended to read as follows:From any state moneys made available for such purpose, the state of Washington, through the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections, shall, in accordance with this chapter and applicable departmental rules, share in the cost of providing services to juveniles.Sec. 32. RCW 13.06.030 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 717 are each amended to read as follows:The department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections shall adopt rules prescribing minimum standards for the operation of consolidated juvenile services programs for juvenile offenders and such other rules as may be necessary for the administration of the provisions of this chapter. Consolidated juvenile services is a mechanism through which the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections supports local county comprehensive program plans in providing services to offender groups. Standards shall be sufficiently flexible to support current programs which have demonstrated effectiveness and efficiency, to foster development of innovative and improved services for juvenile offenders, to permit direct contracting with private vendors, and to encourage community support for and assistance to local programs. The secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections shall seek advice from appropriate juvenile justice system participants in developing standards and procedures for the operation of consolidated juvenile services programs and the distribution of funds under this chapter.Sec. 33. RCW 13.06.040 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 718 are each amended to read as follows:Any county or group of counties may make application to the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections in the manner and form prescribed by the department for financial aid for the cost of consolidated juvenile services programs. Any such application must include a plan or plans for providing consolidated services to juvenile offenders in accordance with standards of the department of corrections.Sec. 34. RCW 13.06.050 and 2020 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:No county shall be entitled to receive any state funds provided by this chapter until its application and plan are approved, and unless and until the minimum standards prescribed by the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections are complied with and then only on such terms as are set forth in this section. In addition, any county making application for state funds under this chapter that also operates a juvenile detention facility must have standards of operations in place that include: Intake and admissions, medical and health care, communication, correspondence, visiting and telephone use, security and control, sanitation and hygiene, juvenile rights, rules and discipline, property, juvenile records, safety and emergency procedures, programming, release and transfer, training and staff development, and food service.(1) The distribution of funds to a county or a group of counties shall be based on criteria including but not limited to the county's per capita income, regional or county at-risk populations, juvenile crime or arrest rates, rates of poverty, size of racial minority populations, existing programs, and the effectiveness and efficiency of consolidating local programs towards reducing commitments to state correctional facilities for offenders whose standard range disposition does not include commitment of the offender to the department and reducing reliance on other traditional departmental services.(2) The secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections will reimburse a county upon presentation and approval of a valid claim pursuant to the provisions of this chapter based on actual performance in meeting the terms and conditions of the approved plan and contract. Funds received by participating counties under this chapter shall not be used to replace local funds for existing programs.Sec. 35. RCW 28A.190.050 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 723 are each amended to read as follows:Each school district required to conduct a program of education pursuant to RCW 28A.190.030, and the department of social and health services and the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections shall hereafter negotiate and execute a written contract for each school year or such longer period as may be agreed to which delineates the manner in which their respective duties and authority will be cooperatively performed and exercised, and any disputes and grievances resolved. Any such contract may provide for the performance of duties by a school district in addition to those set forth in RCW 28A.190.030 (1) through (5), including duties imposed upon the department of social and health services and the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections and their agents pursuant to RCW 28A.190.040: PROVIDED, That funds identified in RCW 28A.190.030(6) and/or funds provided by the department of social and health services and the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections are available to fully pay the direct and indirect costs of such additional duties and the district is otherwise authorized by law to perform such duties in connection with the maintenance and operation of a school district.Sec. 36. RCW 28A.190.060 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 724 are each amended to read as follows:The department of social and health services and the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections shall provide written notice on or before April 15th of each school year to the superintendent of each school district conducting a program of education pursuant to this chapter of any foreseeable residential school closure, reduction in the number of residents, or any other cause for a reduction in the school district's staff for the next school year. In the event the department of social and health services and the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections fail to provide notice as prescribed by this section, the departments shall be liable and responsible for the payment of the salary and employment related costs for the next school year of each school district employee whose contract the school district would have nonrenewed but for the failure of the departments to provide notice.Sec. 37. RCW 71.34.795 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 725 are each amended to read as follows:When in the judgment of the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections the welfare of any person committed to or confined in any state juvenile correctional institution or facility necessitates that the person be transferred or moved for observation, diagnosis, or treatment to an evaluation and treatment facility, the secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections or the secretary's designee is authorized to order and effect such move or transfer for a period of up to fourteen days, provided that the secretary notifies the original committing court of the transfer and the evaluation and treatment facility is in agreement with the transfer. No person committed to or confined in any state juvenile correctional institution or facility may be transferred to an evaluation and treatment facility for more than fourteen days unless that person has been admitted as a voluntary patient or committed for one hundred eighty-day treatment under this chapter or ninety-day treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW if eighteen years of age or older. Underlying jurisdiction of minors transferred or committed under this section remains with the state correctional institution. A voluntary admitted minor or minors committed under this section and no longer meeting the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall be returned to the state correctional institution to serve the remaining time of the underlying dispositional order or sentence. The time spent by the minor at the evaluation and treatment facility shall be credited towards the minor's juvenile court sentence.Sec. 38. RCW 72.01.210 and 2019 c 146 s 7 and 2019 c 107 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary of corrections shall appoint institutional religious coordinators for the state correctional institutions for convicted felons. Institutional religious coordinators shall be appointed as employees of the department of corrections. The secretary of corrections may further contract with religious coordinators to be employed as is necessary to meet the religious needs of those inmates whose religious denominations are not represented by institutional religious coordinators and where volunteer religious coordinators are not available.(2) Institutional religious coordinators appointed by the department of corrections under this section shall have qualifications necessary to serve all faith groups represented within the department. Every religious coordinator so appointed or contracted with shall have qualifications consistent with community standards of the given faith group to which he or she belongs and shall not be required to violate the tenets of his or her faith when acting in an ecclesiastical role.(3) The secretary of ((children, youth, and families))the department of corrections shall appoint religious coordinators for the correctional institutions for juveniles found delinquent by the juvenile courts; and the secretary of corrections and the secretary of social and health services shall appoint one or more religious coordinators for other custodial, correctional, and mental institutions under their control.(4) Except as provided in this section, the religious coordinators so appointed under this section shall have the qualifications and shall be compensated in an amount as recommended by the appointing department and approved by the director of financial management.Sec. 39. RCW 72.01.410 and 2019 c 322 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Whenever any person is convicted as an adult in the courts of this state of a felony offense committed under the age of ((eighteen))18, and is committed for a term of confinement, that person shall be ((initially)) placed in a facility operated by the department of children, youth, and families. The department of corrections shall determine the person's earned release date.(((a) While in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families, the person must have the same treatment, housing options, transfer, and access to program resources as any other person committed to that juvenile correctional facility or institution pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW. Except as provided under (d) of this subsection, treatment, placement, and program decisions shall be at the sole discretion of the department of children, youth, and families. The person shall not be transferred to the custody of the department of corrections without the approval of the department of children, youth, and families until the person reaches the age of twenty-five.(b))) If the person's sentence includes a term of community custody, the department of ((children, youth, and families))corrections shall not release the person to community custody until the department of corrections has approved the person's release plan pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(b). ((If a person is held past his or her earned release date pending release plan approval, the department of children, youth, and families shall retain custody until a plan is approved or the person completes the ordered term of confinement prior to age twenty-five.(c) If the department of children, youth, and families determines that retaining custody of the person in a facility of the department of children, youth, and families presents a significant safety risk, the department of children, youth, and families may transfer the person to the custody of the department of corrections.(d) The department of corrections must retain authority over custody decisions relating to a person whose earned release date is on or after the person's twenty-fifth birthday and who is placed in a facility operated by the department of children, youth, and families under this section, unless the person qualifies for partial confinement under RCW 72.01.412, and must approve any leave from the facility. When the person turns age twenty-five, he or she must be transferred to the department of corrections, except as described under RCW 72.01.412. The department of children, youth, and families has all routine and day-to-day operations authority for the person while the person is in its custody.))(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) ((and (c))) of this subsection, a person under the age of ((eighteen))18 who is ((transferred))committed to the custody of the department of corrections must be placed in a juvenile correctional institution or a housing unit, or a portion of a housing unit, that is separated from other persons in custody who are ((eighteen))18 years of age or older, until the person reaches the age of ((eighteen))18.(b) ((A person who is transferred to the custody of the department of corrections and reaches eighteen years of age may remain in a housing unit for persons under the age of eighteen if the secretary of corrections determines that: (i) The person's needs and the rehabilitation goals for the person could continue to be better met by the programs and housing environment that is separate from other persons in custody who are eighteen years of age and older; and (ii) the programs or housing environment for persons under the age of eighteen will not be substantially affected by the continued placement of the person in that environment. The person may remain placed in a housing unit for persons under the age of eighteen until such time as the secretary of corrections determines that the person's needs and goals are no longer better met in that environment but in no case past the person's twenty-fifth birthday.(c))) A person ((transferred))committed to the custody of the department of corrections and placed in an adult correctional institution who is under the age of ((eighteen))18 may be housed in an intensive management unit or administrative segregation unit containing offenders ((eighteen))18 years of age or older if it is necessary for the safety or security of the offender or staff. In these cases, the offender must be kept physically separate from other offenders at all times.(((3) The department of children, youth, and families must review the placement of a person over age twenty-one in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families under this section to determine whether the person should be transferred to the custody of the department of corrections. The department of children, youth, and families may determine the frequency of the review required under this subsection, but the review must occur at least once before the person reaches age twenty-three if the person's commitment period in a juvenile institution extends beyond the person's twenty-third birthday.))Sec. 40. RCW 43.216.005 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislature finds that state services are not currently organized and delivered in a way that achieves the optimal outcomes for children, youth, and families. The legislature believes that, to improve service delivery and outcomes, existing services must be restructured into a comprehensive agency dedicated to the safety, development, and well-being of children that emphasizes prevention, early childhood development, and early intervention, and supporting parents to be their children's first and most important teachers.(2) The legislature finds that:(a) The early years of a child's life are critical to the child's healthy brain development and that the quality of caregiving during the early years can significantly impact the child's intellectual, social, and emotional development;(b) A successful outcome for every child obtaining a K-12 education depends on children being prepared from birth for academic and social success in school. For children at risk of school failure, the opportunity gap often emerges as early as eighteen months of age;(c) A more cohesive and integrated early learning system has been established that provides a solid foundation for further improvements in the quality and availability of early learning programs; and(d) Increasing the availability of high quality services for children ages birth to three and their parents or caregivers will result in improved school and life outcomes.(3) Research is clear that quality culturally and linguistically responsive early care and education builds the foundation for a child's success in school and in life. In restructuring early learning and child welfare services, the legislature seeks to build on the success of Washington's early learning efforts to assure children most at risk of experiencing adversity are provided high quality early learning experiences.(4) The legislature finds that advancements in research and science have identified indicators of risk, how they impact healthy development, and the critical importance of stable, nurturing relationships, particularly in the early years. Services for families and children should be prioritized for those who are most at risk of neglect, physical harm, and other adverse factors.(5) The legislature finds that a focus on adolescent development is needed to ensure that effective supports and interventions are targeted to support adolescents successfully transitioning to adulthood. ((Youth known to both the child welfare and juvenile justice systems often suffer from childhood trauma, have multisystem involvement, and experience homelessness. Increased integration of the child welfare and juvenile justice systems can increase opportunities for prevention and improve outcomes for youth in both systems.))(6) The legislature finds that children and youth of color are disproportionately impacted at every point in the child welfare and juvenile justice systems. The department of children, youth, and families must prioritize addressing equity, disproportionality, and disparity in service delivery and outcomes, and provide transparent, frequent reporting of outcomes by race, ethnicity, and geography. The legislature finds that the state values the partnership with tribes in providing services for our children and youth and intends to honor the government-to-government relationship between the state and tribes.(7) The department of children, youth, and families must be anchored in a culture of innovation, transparency, accountability, rigorous data analysis, and reliance on research and evidence-based interventions.(8) The legislature finds that the public expects an effective service delivery system that is comprehensive, accountable, and goes beyond a single department's role. For this reason, the legislature is creating a mechanism in the department of children, youth, and families to align, integrate, and ensure accountability of state services for children, youth, and their families across state agencies so that there is a seamless, effective, prevention and early intervention-based service system regardless of which state agency is responsible for particular services.(9) The legislature finds that the work of the department of children, youth, and families will only be as successful as the workforceâboth the agency employees and community-based providers. Increased support for the professionals working with children, youth, and families is critical to improving outcomes.(10) The legislature further finds that other states have successfully established integrated departments dedicated to serving children, youth, and families. These departments have improved the visibility of child and family issues, increased authority and accountability, enabled system improvements, and created a stronger focus on improving child outcomes.Sec. 41. RCW 43.216.035 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning July 1, 2018, the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability shall have a director, appointed by the secretary, who shall set the agenda and oversee the office, who reports to the secretary. The secretary shall ensure that the leadership and staff of the office do not have responsibility for service delivery but are wholly dedicated to directing and implementing the innovation, alignment, integration, collaboration, systemic reform work, and building external partnerships for which the office is responsible.(2) The primary duties and focus of the office are on continuous improvement and includes the functions in this subsection:(a) To review and recommend implementation of advancements in research;(b) To work with other state government agencies and tribal governments to align and measure outcomes across state agencies and state-funded agencies serving children, youth, and families including, but not limited to, the use of evidence-based and research-based practices and contracting;(c) To work with other state government agencies, tribal governments, partner agencies, and state-funded organizations on the use of data-driven, research-based interventions that effectively intervene in the lives of at-risk young people and align systems that serve children, youth, and their families;(d) To develop approaches for integrated real-time data sharing, aligned outcomes, and collective accountability across state government agencies to the public;(e) To conduct quality assurance and evaluation of programs and services within the department;(f) To lead partnerships with the community, research and teaching institutions, philanthropic organizations, and nonprofit organizations;(g) To lead collaboration with courts, tribal courts and tribal attorneys, attorneys, court-appointed special advocates, and guardians ad litem to align and integrate the work of the department with those involved in decision making in child welfare ((and juvenile justice)) cases;(h) To produce, in collaboration with key stakeholders, an annual work plan that includes priorities for ongoing policy, practice, and system reform, tracking, and reporting out on the performance of department reforms;(i) To appoint members of an external stakeholder committee who value racial and ethnic diversity and that includes representatives from a philanthropic organization, research entity representatives, representatives from the business community, one or more parent representatives, youth representatives, tribal representatives, representatives from communities of color, foster parent representatives, representatives from an organization that advocates for the best interest of the child, and community-based providers, who will advise the office on priorities for practice, policy, and system reform and on effective management policies, development of appropriate organizational culture, external partnerships, knowledge of best practices, and leveraging additional resources to carry out the duties of the department;(j) To provide a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2018, that includes recommendations regarding whether the juvenile rehabilitation division of the department of social and health services should be integrated into the department of children, youth, and families, and if so, what the appropriate timing and process is for integration of the juvenile rehabilitation division into the department of children, youth, and families;(k) To provide a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2018, that includes:(i) A review of the current process for addressing foster parent complaints and concerns through the department and through the office of the family and children's ombuds established in chapter 43.06A RCW that includes an examination of any deficiencies of the current system; and(ii) Recommendations for expanding, modifying, and enhancing the current system for addressing individual foster parent complaints to improve child welfare, the experience of foster parents, and the overall functioning of the child welfare system; and(l) To provide a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2018, that includes recommendations regarding whether the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs in the department of commerce should be integrated into the department, and the process for that integration if recommended.Sec. 42. RCW 43.216.015 and 2025 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The department of children, youth, and families is created as an executive branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. The vision for the department is that Washington state's children and youth grow up safe and healthyâthriving physically, emotionally, and academically, nurtured by family and community.(b) The department, in partnership with state and local agencies, tribes, and communities, shall protect children and youth from harm and promote healthy development with effective, high quality prevention, intervention, and early education services delivered in an equitable manner. An important role for the department shall be to provide preventative services to help secure and preserve families in crisis. The department shall partner with the federally recognized Indian tribes to develop effective services for youth and families while respecting the sovereignty of those tribes and the government-to-government relationship. Nothing in chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. alters the duties, requirements, and policies of the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Secs. 1901 through 1963, as amended, or the Indian child welfare act, chapter 13.38 RCW.(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, the department must develop definitions for, work plans to address, and metrics to measure the outcomes for children, youth, and families served by the department and must work with state agencies to ensure services for children, youth, and families are science-based, outcome-driven, data-informed, and collaborative.(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2018, the department must establish short and long-term population level outcome measure goals, including metrics regarding reducing disparities by family income, race, and ethnicity in each outcome.(b) In addition to transparent, frequent reporting of the outcome measures in (c)(i) through (((viii)))(vi) of this subsection, the department must report to the legislature an examination of engagement, resource utilization, and outcomes for clients receiving department services and youth participating in juvenile court alternative programs funded by the department, no less than annually and beginning September 1, 2020. The data in this report must be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and geography. This report must identify areas of focus to advance equity that will inform department strategies so that all children, youth, and families are thriving. Metrics detailing progress towards eliminating disparities and disproportionality over time must also be included. The report must also include information on department outcome measures, actions taken, progress toward these goals, and plans for the future year.(c) The outcome measures must include, but are not limited to:(i) Improving child development and school readiness through voluntary, high quality early learning opportunities as measured by: (A) Increasing the number and proportion of children kindergarten-ready as measured by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WAKids) assessment including mathematics; (B) increasing the proportion of children in early learning programs that have achieved the level 3 or higher early achievers quality standard; and (C) increasing the available supply of licensed child care in child care centers, outdoor nature-based child care, and family homes, including providers not receiving state subsidy;(ii) Preventing child abuse and neglect;(iii) Improving child and youth safety, permanency, and well-being as measured by: (A) Reducing the number of children entering out-of-home care; (B) reducing a child's length of stay in out-of-home care; (C) reducing maltreatment of youth while in out-of-home care; (D) licensing more foster homes than there are children in foster care; (E) reducing the number of children that reenter out-of-home care within twelve months; (F) increasing the stability of placements for children in out-of-home care; and (G) developing strategies to demonstrate to foster families that their service and involvement is highly valued by the department, as demonstrated by the development of strategies to consult with foster families regarding future placement of a foster child currently placed with a foster family;(iv) Improving reconciliation of children and youth with their families as measured by: (A) Increasing family reunification; and (B) increasing the number of youth who are reunified with their family of origin;(v) ((In collaboration with county juvenile justice programs, improving adolescent outcomes including reducing multisystem involvement and homelessness; and increasing school graduation rates and successful transitions to adulthood for youth involved in the child welfare and juvenile justice systems;(vi))) Reducing future demand for mental health and substance use disorder treatment for youth involved in the child welfare ((and juvenile justice)) system((s)); and(((vii) In collaboration with county juvenile justice programs, reducing criminal justice involvement and recidivism as measured by: (A) An increase in the number of youth who successfully complete the terms of diversion or alternative sentencing options; (B) a decrease in the number of youth who commit subsequent crimes; and (C) eliminating the discharge of youth from institutional settings into homelessness; and(viii)))(vi) Eliminating racial and ethnic disproportionality and disparities in system involvement and across child and youth outcomes in collaboration with other state agencies.(4) Beginning July 1, 2018, the department must:(a) Lead ongoing collaborative work to minimize or eliminate systemic barriers to effective, integrated services in collaboration with state agencies serving children, youth, and families;(b) Identify necessary improvements and updates to statutes relevant to their responsibilities and proposing legislative changes to the governor no less than biennially;(c) Help create a data-focused environment in which there are aligned outcomes and shared accountability for achieving those outcomes, with shared, real-time data that is accessible to authorized persons interacting with the family, child, or youth to identify what is needed and which services would be effective;(d) Lead the provision of state services to adolescents, focusing on key transition points for youth, including exiting foster care and institutions, and coordinating with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to address the unique needs of homeless youth; and(e) Create and annually update a list of the rights and responsibilities of foster parents in partnership with foster parent representatives. The list of foster parent rights and responsibilities must be posted on the department's website, provided to individuals participating in a foster parent orientation before licensure, provided to foster parents in writing at the time of licensure, and provided to foster parents applying for license renewal.(5) The department is accountable to the public. To ensure transparency, beginning December 30, 2018, agency performance data for the services provided by the department, including outcome data for contracted services, must be available to the public, consistent with confidentiality laws, federal protections, and individual rights to privacy. Publicly available data must include budget and funding decisions, performance-based contracting data, including data for contracted services, and performance data on metrics identified in this section. The board must work with the secretary and director to develop the most effective and cost-efficient ways to make department data available to the public, including making this data readily available on the department's website.(6) The department shall ensure that all new and renewed contracts for services are performance-based.(7) The department must execute all new and renewed contracts for services in accordance with this section and consistent with RCW 74.13B.020. When contracted services are managed through a network administrator or other third party, the department must execute data-sharing agreements with the entities managing the contracts to track provider performance measures. Contracts with network administrators or other third parties must provide the contract administrator the ability to shift resources from one provider to another, to evaluate individual provider performance, to add or delete services in consultation with the department, and to reinvest savings from increased efficiencies into new or improved services in their catchment area. Whenever possible, contractor performance data must be made available to the public, consistent with confidentiality laws and individual rights to privacy.(8)(a) The board shall begin its work and call the first meeting of the board on or after July 1, 2018. The board shall immediately assume the duties of the legislative children's oversight committee, as provided for in RCW 74.13.570 and assume the full functions of the board as provided for in this section by July 1, 2019. The office of innovation, alignment, and accountability shall provide quarterly updates regarding the implementation of the department to the board between July 1, 2018, and July 1, 2019.(b) The office of the family and children's ombuds shall establish the board. The board is authorized for the purpose of monitoring and ensuring that the department achieves the stated outcomes of chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess., and complies with administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules, and policies pertaining to early learning, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and children and family services.(9)(a) The board shall consist of the following members:(i) Two senators and two representatives from the legislature with one member from each major caucus;(ii) One nonvoting representative from the governor's office;(iii) One subject matter expert in early learning;(iv) One subject matter expert in child welfare;(v) One subject matter expert in juvenile rehabilitation and justice;(vi) One subject matter expert in eliminating disparities in child outcomes by family income and race and ethnicity;(vii) One tribal representative from west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;(viii) One tribal representative from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;(ix) One current or former foster parent representative;(x) One representative of an organization that advocates for the best interest of the child;(xi) One parent stakeholder group representative;(xii) One law enforcement representative;(xiii) One child welfare caseworker representative;(xiv) One early childhood learning program implementation practitioner;(xv) One current or former foster youth under age twenty-five;(xvi) One individual under age twenty-five with current or previous experience with the juvenile justice system;(xvii) One physician with experience working with children or youth; and(xviii) One judicial representative presiding over child welfare court proceedings or other children's matters.(b) The senate members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the senate. The house of representatives members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives. Members shall be appointed before the close of each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year.(c) The remaining board members shall be nominated by the governor, subject to the approval of the appointed legislators by majority vote, and serve four-year terms. When nominating and approving members after July 28, 2019, the governor and appointed legislators must ensure that at least five of the board members reside east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.(10) The board has the following powers, which may be exercised by majority vote of the board:(a) To receive reports of the office of the family and children's ombuds;(b) To obtain access to all relevant records in the possession of the office of the family and children's ombuds, except as prohibited by law;(c) To select its officers and adoption of rules for orderly procedure;(d) To request investigations by the office of the family and children's ombuds of administrative acts;(e) To request and receive information, outcome data, documents, materials, and records from the department relating to children and family welfare, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and early learning;(f) To determine whether the department is achieving the performance measures;(g) If final review is requested by a licensee, to review whether department licensors appropriately and consistently applied agency rules in inspection reports that do not involve a violation of health and safety standards as defined in RCW 43.216.395 in cases that have already been reviewed by the internal review process described in RCW 43.216.395 with the authority to overturn, change, or uphold such decisions;(h) To conduct annual reviews of a sample of department contracts for services from a variety of program and service areas to ensure that those contracts are performance-based and to assess the measures included in each contract; and(i) Upon receipt of records or data from the office of the family and children's ombuds or the department, the board is subject to the same confidentiality restrictions as the office of the family and children's ombuds is under RCW 43.06A.050. The provisions of RCW 43.06A.060 also apply to the board.(11) The board has general oversight over the performance and policies of the department and shall provide advice and input to the department and the governor.(12) The board must no less than twice per year convene stakeholder meetings to allow feedback to the board regarding contracting with the department, departmental use of local, state, private, and federal funds, and other matters as relating to carrying out the duties of the department.(13) The board shall review existing surveys of providers, customers, parent groups, and external services to assess whether the department is effectively delivering services, and shall conduct additional surveys as needed to assess whether the department is effectively delivering services.(14) The board is subject to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, except to the extent disclosure of records or information is otherwise confidential under state or federal law.(15) Records or information received by the board is confidential to the extent permitted by state or federal law. This subsection does not create an exception for records covered by RCW 13.50.100.(16) Unless specified otherwise, board members shall receive no compensation for their service on the board, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while conducting business of the board when authorized by the board and within resources allocated for this purpose. Appointed legislators shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Board members with direct lived experience may receive compensation as provided in RCW 43.03.220 and 43.03.270 and are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(17) The board shall select, by majority vote, an executive director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the board and shall be responsible for carrying out the policies adopted by the board. The executive director is exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and shall serve at the pleasure of the board established in this section.(18) The board shall maintain a staff not to exceed one full-time equivalent employee. The board-selected executive director of the board is responsible for coordinating staff appointments.(19) The board shall issue an annual report to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year with an initial report delivered by December 1, 2019. The report must review the department's progress towards meeting stated performance measures and desired performance outcomes, and must also include a review of the department's strategic plan, policies, and rules.(20) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Board" means the oversight board for children, youth, and families established in subsection (8) of this section.(b) "Direct lived experience" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.03.220.(c) "Director" means the director of the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability.(d) "Performance-based contract" means results-oriented contracting that focuses on the quality or outcomes that tie at least a portion of the contractor's payment, contract extensions, or contract renewals to the achievement of specific measurable performance standards and requirements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 43. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 13.40.468 (Juvenile rehabilitation administrationâState quality assurance program) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 620 & 2006 c 304 s 6; and(2) RCW 13.40.660 (Exchange of intimate images by minorsâFindingsâWork group) and 2019 c 128 s 2.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 44. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---